Missouri, session 2026, HB2549.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 252, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 252.047, to read as follows:
252.047. 1. The commission shall not require any resident or nonresident
landowner, as such terms are defined by rules promulgated by the commission, to
register the landowner's property before receiving any landowner hunting permit or to
possess any hunting permit to take wildlife on the landowner's property. Any existing
or future requirement for a landowner to register the landowner's property to receive
any landowner hunting permit is hereby void.
2. The commission shall issue any landowner hunting permit requested by any
resident or nonresident landowner who owns at least five acres of real property and
requests such landowner hunting permit.
3. (1) As used in this subsection, the term "immediate family member of the
landowner" means a landowner's spouse, child, stepchild, sibling, stepsibling, parent,
stepparent, grandparent, grandchild, and any person in an adoptive relationship with
the landowner.
(2) A landowner who qualifies for any landowner hunting permit under this
section may request any hunting permit authorizing the taking of wildlife on the
landowner's property for a specified two-day period on behalf of one nonresident
immediate family member of the landowner. No more than one request shall be made in
a calendar year under this subsection.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2549 2
(3) The commission shall issue such hunting permit upon request. Such permit
shall be provided free of charge.
✔